fr: Type de conduite de moto: A bande; Chaîne; Arbre; Autre
hu: Motorkerékpár hajtástípusa: Szíj; Lánc; Tengely; Egyéb
lt-LT: Motociklo pavarų dėžės tipas: Diržas; Grandinė; Velenas; Kita
cs: Typ pohonu motocyklu: Pásová; Řetěz; Hřídelový; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de transmissão de motociclo: Cinto; Corrente; Eixo cardan; Outro
ru: Тип привода мотоцикла: Ремень; Цепь; Вал; Другой
tr: Motosiklet tahrik tipi: Kemer; Zincir; Şaft; Diğer
zh-TW: 摩托車驅動類型: 腰帶; 鏈條; 軸; 其他
th: ประเภทการขับเคลื่อนของรถจักรยานยนต์: สายพานขัด; แหวนโซ่; เพลา; อื่นๆ
ja: バイクの駆動方式: ベルト; チェーン; シャフト; その他
sv: Drivsystem för motorcykel: Bälte; Kedja; Axel; Övrigt
nb: Kjøretype for motorsykkel: Belte; Kjede; Skaft; Annet
el: Μετάδοση κίνησης μοτοσικλέτας: Ζώνη; Αλυσίδα; Άξονας; Άλλο
ko: 오토바이 구동 방식: 벨트; 체인; 샤프트; 기타
fi: Moottoripyörän vetotapa: Vyö; Ketju; Akseli; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul transmisiei motocicletei: Curea; Lanț; Arbore; Altele
es: Tipo de tracción de motocicleta: Cinturón; Cadena; Eje; Otros
sk-SK: Typ pohonu motocykla: Opasok; Reťaz; Hriadeľ; Iné
bg-BG: Тип задвижване на мотоциклет: Колан; Верига; Вал; Други
nl: Type motorfietsaandrijving: Riem; Ketting; As; Andere
zh-CN: 摩托车驱动类型: 带式; 链式戒指; 轴; 其他
vi: Loại dẫn động xe máy: Máy chà nhám băng; Xích; Trục; Khác
pl: Typ napędu motocykla: Pas; Łańcuszkowy; Wał; Inne
da: Motorcykeldrevtype: Bælte; Kæde; Aksel; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona motornega kolesa: Jermenski; Veriga; Gredni; Drugo
hr-HR: Tip pogona motocikla: Remen; Lanac; Osovina; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de direção da motocicleta: Cinto; Corrente; Eixo; Outro
de: Art des Motorradantriebs: Band; Kette; Welle; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di trazione del motociclo: Cintura; Catena; Albero motore; Altro
en: Motorcycle drive type: Belt; Chain; Shaft; Other